Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 5. MATTERS AFFECTING PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE B. COUNTY OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 153. COMPENSATION OF COUNTY OFFICERS ON FEE BASIS

Sec. 153.001. COUNTY TREASURER'S COMMISSION FOR RECEIVING OR PAYING OUT MONEY. (a) In a county in which the county treasurer is compensated on a fee basis, the treasurer is entitled to the following commissions for receiving and paying out money for the county:

(1) for money other than school funds, a percentage set by order of the commissioners court not to exceed 2-1/2 percent of the money received and a percentage set by order of the court not to exceed 2-1/2 percent of the money paid out; and

(2) for school funds, one-half percent of the money received and one-half percent of the money paid out.

(b) A commission earned under Subsection (a)(2) is payable from the available school fund of the county.

(c) A county treasurer may not receive a commission under this section for money received from the treasurer's predecessor or money paid to the treasurer's successor. A county treasurer may not receive a commission under Subsection (a)(2) for transferring money.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 153.002. FEE FOR KEEPING LEDGER AND MAKING STATEMENTS. In a county that does not have the office of county auditor and in which the county treasurer is compensated on a fee basis, the treasurer is entitled to annual compensation for keeping the county finance ledger and for making the statements required by Section 114.021. The compensation is in an amount that equals $5 for each $1,000 tax assessed and due to the county, but the amount may not be less than $100 or more than $250. Compensation under this section is paid on the order of the commissioners court.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 207 (H.B. 398), Sec. 3, eff. May 25, 2007.

Sec. 153.003. MONTHLY STATEMENT OF EXPENSES OF OFFICERS. (a) At the end of each month, a county officer who is compensated on a fee basis shall prepare an itemized and sworn statement of the actual and necessary expenses incurred by the officer in the conduct of the office. The statement shall be made a part of the fees statement required by Section 114.041 and must contain:

(1) the name of the case, if any, in connection with which an expense is incurred; and

(2) the name and position of, and the amount of the salary actually paid to, each assistant or deputy of the officer.

(b) For the purposes of this section, actual and necessary expenses include expenses for:

(1) travel, stationery, stamps, and telephone service; and

(2) premiums on officials' bonds, including surety bonds for deputies, and premiums on fire, burglary, theft, and robbery insurance to protect public funds.

(c) The salaries paid to the officer's assistants, deputies, and clerks and the incurred expenses shall be paid from fees earned by the officer.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.